Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-2452
Violations;
disciplinary action.

Any person who violates the
Automated Medication Systems Act may be subject to disciplinary action by
the Division of Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services
under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act or the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2008, LB308, § 8;

Laws 2013, LB326, § 11.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.